Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7885.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39-3-37.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-3 entitled "Regulatory
Powers of Administration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-3-37.3. Informational notice on electric bills — Electric distribution company.
(a) Every electric distribution company that shall charge for the distribution of electricity
to any house, building, tenement, or estate shall conspicuously display upon the bill or statement
for any customer the following information:
(1) The total number of kilowatt hours consumed;
(2) The total cost of distributing the consumer power to the customer;
(3) Transition charges;
(4) Conservation costs;
(5) The total cost of transmitting the consumed power to the appropriate distribution site;
(6) All applicable credits;
(7) Applicable streetlight rental costs;
(8) Applicable taxes;
(9) The cost of power delivered; and
(10) All other costs, charges, or fees added to the bill or statement.
(b) The electric distribution company shall issue a single bill for electric service to all
customers in its service territory; provided however, that customers of nonregulated power

producers may request that the nonregulated power producers provide separate bills for electricity
supply.
(c) For purposes of this section, “conspicuously display” means including a visual
illustration showing each component of the utility bill and the cost associated with each component
including, but not limited to, supply, distribution, transmission, ratepayer funded programs and
policy, taxes and all other costs. The division shall have the authority to approve or deny the
adequacy of the format chosen by the company for compliance with this provision.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005586
========
LC005586 - Page 2 of 3